Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1,137
Alternative to stipend; requirement.

As a preferable alternative to the requirement of section 85-1,134, the University of Nebraska-Lincoln may limit the number of hours required to participate in intercollegiate athletics to such number that participation in a sport would not impede the student athlete's ability to carry a regular academic workload which will allow such student athlete to graduate in four years, will allow the student athlete adequate time to participate in the intellectual and cultural activities on campus, and further will allow the student athlete to work an average of at least twelve hours per week during the academic school year.

Laws 2003, LB 688, § 7.
For the operative date for this section, see section 85-1,136.